West Virginia, session 2026, SB448.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. DIVISION OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION. §15A-3-19. Brain injury screening training; brain injury screening study; memorandum of understanding. (a) The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, through its medical provider, in conjunction with the West Virginia University Center for Excellence in Disabilities, shall train its personnel to conduct screenings for brain injury in the incarcerated population.(b) By July 1, 2028, the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall screen all incoming and currently incarcerated individuals for brain injury. Screening processes shall be designed with input from the study group formed by §27-6A-12 of this code.(c) The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Rehabilitation Services, and the Department of Veterans Assistance shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the study group formed by §27-6A-12 of this code to permit sharing of confidential health records for purposes of collecting information pertinent to the study group’s duties.